District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.26

Subpoenas; oaths; examination of witnesses.

The Mayor, on any matter within his or her jurisdiction under this subchapter, shall have the authority to:

(1)

Issue subpoenas for and compel the attendance of witnesses within a radius of 100 miles of the District of Columbia;

(2)

Administer oaths;

(3)

Examine witnesses; and

(4)

Require the production of books, papers, documents, and other evidence.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2326, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-624.26.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.26.